bg-BG: Характеристики на целеви колчета за крикет: Гъвкава конструкция от пяна; Цвят с висока видимост; Сменяем шип или основа; LED светлини; Фиксирани бейлове; Изскачащ дизайн; Пружинно връщане; Устойчивост на атмосферни влияния; Основа с тежест; Други
nb: Funksjoner for cricketstubbemål: Fleksibel skumkonstruksjon; Lett synlig farge; Utskiftbar pigg eller base; LED-lys; Permanente bails; Pop-up-design; Fjærretur; Værbestandig; Vektet base; Annet
ko: 크리켓 스텀프 타깃 특징: 유연한 폼 구조; 고시인성 색상; 교체형 스파이크 또는 베이스; LED 조명; 고정형 베일; 팝업 디자인; 스프링 리턴; 내후성; 무게추 베이스; 기타
sk-SK: Cieľové vlastnosti kriketových kolíkov: Konštrukcia z flexibilnej peny; Dobre viditeľná farba; Vymeniteľný hrot alebo základňa; LED svetlá; Pevné kolíky; Pop-up dizajn; Pružinový návrat; Odolné voči poveternostným vplyvom; Zaťažená základňa; Iné
es: Características del objetivo de los postes de críquet: Estructura de espuma flexible; Color de alta visibilidad; Espiga o base intercambiable; Luces led; Travesaños fijos; Diseño emergente; Retorno por resorte; Resistente a la intemperie; Base con peso; Otro
de: Merkmale des Cricket-Trainingsziels mit Stumps: Flexible Schaumstoffkonstruktion; Gut sichtbare Farbe; Austauschbarer Spike oder Basis; LED-Beleuchtung; Feste Bails; Popup-Design; Federrücklauf; Wetterfest; Beschwerte Basis; Sonstige
pl: Cechy celu treningowego ze słupkami do krykieta: Elastyczna konstrukcja piankowa; Kolor o wysokiej widoczności; Wymienny kolec lub podstawa; Światła LED; Stałe poprzeczki; Konstrukcja pop-up; Powrót sprężynowy; Odporność na warunki atmosferyczne; Obciążona podstawa; Inne
vi: Các tính năng mục tiêu của cọc gôn cricket: Cấu trúc xốp linh hoạt; Màu dễ nhìn; Đinh cắm hoặc đế có thể hoán đổi; Đèn LED; Cọc cố định; Thiết kế tự bật; Bật lại bằng lò xo; Chống chịu thời tiết; Đế gia trọng; Khác
pt-PT: Características do alvo do cepo de grilo: Construção em espuma flexível; Cor de alta visibilidade; Base ou espigão intercambiáveis; Luzes LED; Travessas permanentes; Design pop-up; Retorno por mola; Resistente às intempéries; Base pesada; Outro
hu: Krikettcölöp céljellemzői: Rugalmas habszerkezet; Jól látható szín; Cserélhető tüske vagy talp; LED-világítás; Rögzített pálcák; Pop-up kialakítás; Visszaugró rugós; Időjárásálló; Súlyozott talp; Egyéb
ro-RO: Caracteristicile țintei pentru porțile de cricket: Construcție din spumă flexibilă; Culoare de înaltă vizibilitate; Țăruș sau bază interschimbabilă; Lumini LED; Traverse permanente; Design pop-up; Revenire cu arc; Rezistent la intemperii; Bază lestată; Altele
hr-HR: Značajke ciljanog panjeva cvrčka: Izvedba od fleksibilne pjene; Lako uočljiva boja; Izmjenjivi šiljak ili baza; LED svjetla; Fiksne prečke; Pop-up dizajn; Povratna opruga; Otpornost na vremenske uvjete; Baza s utegom; Ostalo
fr: Caractéristiques des cibles de cricket: Structure en mousse flexible; Couleur haute visibilité; Pointe ou base interchangeable; Lumières LED; Témoins permanents; Design pop-up; Retour automatique à ressort; Résistant aux intempéries; Base lestée; Autre
ru: Функциональные особенности тренировочных стоек для крикета: Гибкая конструкция из пеноматериала; Хорошо заметный цвет; Сменный штырь или основание; Светодиодная подсветка; Несъемные перемычки; Складная конструкция; Пружинный возврат; Устойчивость к погодным условиям; Утяжеленное основание; Другое
th: คุณสมบัติเฉพาะของเป้าซ้อมหลักคริกเก็ต: โครงสร้างโฟมยืดหยุ่น; สีสะท้อนแสง; เดือยหรือฐานสลับเปลี่ยนได้; ไฟ LED; เบลแบบถาวร; ดีไซน์ป๊อปอัพ; สปริงดึงกลับ; ทนต่อสภาพอากาศ; ฐานถ่วงน้ำหนัก; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Características do alvo em forma de estaca do críquete: Estrutura de espuma flexível; Cor de alta visibilidade; Pino ou base intercambiável; Luzes de LED; Bails permanentes; Design pop-up; Retorno por mola; Resistente a intempéries; Base com peso; Outro
sl-SI: Ciljne lastnosti nastavkov za kriket: Izdelava iz prožne pene; Zelo opazna barva; Zamenljiva konica ali podstavek; Lučke LED; Fiksne prečke; Zasnova pop-up; Vračanje z vzmetjo; Odpornost na vremenske vplive; Obtežen podstavek; Drugo
it: Caratteristiche del bersaglio a forma di ceppo da cricket: Struttura in schiuma flessibile; Colore ad alta visibilità; Puntale o base intercambiabile; Luci LED; Traverse fisse; Design pop-up; Ritorno a molla; Resistente alle intemperie; Base zavorrata; Altro
en: Cricket stump target features: Flexible foam construction; High-visibility color; Interchangeable spike or base; LED lights; Permanent bails; Pop-up design; Spring return; Weather resistant; Weighted base; Other
da: Cricket-stolpernes måleegenskaber: Fleksibel skumkonstruktion; Meget synlig farve; Udskiftelig spids eller fod; LED-lys; Permanente tværpinde; Pop op-design; Fjedermekanisme; Vejrbestandig; Vægtet fod; Andet
lt-LT: Kriketo stulpelių taikinio savybės: Lanksti putplasčio konstrukcija; Gerai matoma spalva; Keičiamas smaigalys arba pagrindas; LED lemputės; Fiksuoti skersinukai; Iššokantis dizainas; Spyruoklinis grąžinimas; Atsparus oro sąlygoms; Svertinis pagrindas; Kita
tr: Kriket kalesi direği hedef özellikleri: Esnek köpük yapısı; Yüksek görünürlüklü renk; Değiştirilebilir saplama veya taban; LED ışıklar; Sabit çıtalar; Açılır kapanır tasarım; Yaylı dönüş; Hava koşullarına dayanıklı; Ağırlıklı taban; Diğer
zh-TW: 板球球門柱靶標特色: 彈性泡棉結構; 高能見度顏色; 可替換地釘或底座; LED 燈; 永久性橫木; 彈出式設計; 彈簧復位; 耐候; 配重底座; 其他
el: Χαρακτηριστικά στόχου κολοβώματος κρίκετ: Κατασκευή από εύκαμπτο αφρό; Χρώμα υψηλής ορατότητας; Εναλλάξιμο καρφί ή βάση; Φώτα LED; Μόνιμα bails; Σχεδιασμός pop-up; Επαναφορά με ελατήριο; Ανθεκτικό στις καιρικές συνθήκες; Βάση με βάρος; Άλλο
cs: Cílové prvky kriketové branky: Pružná pěnová konstrukce; Vysoce viditelná barva; Vyměnitelný hrot nebo základna; LED světla; Pevné kolíky; Vyskakovací design; S pružinou; Odolné vůči počasí; Zatížená základna; Ostatní
sv: Funktioner för cricket stump target: Flexibel skumkonstruktion; Färg med hög synlighet; Utbytbar spik eller bas; LED-lampor; Fasta bails; Popup-design; Fjäderåtergång; Väderbeständig; Viktad bas; Övrigt
ja: クリケットのスタンプターゲット機能: 柔軟なフォーム構造; 高視認性カラー; 交換可能なスパイクまたはベース; LED ライト; 固定式ベイル; ポップアップデザイン; スプリングリターン; 耐候性; ウェイト付きベース; その他
nl: Cricketstump doelkenmerken: Flexibele schuimconstructie; Opvallende kleur; Verwisselbare pin of basis; Ledlampjes; Vaste bails; Pop-upontwerp; Terugvering; Weerbestendig; Verzwaarde basis; Overig
fi: Krikettiportin ominaisuudet: Joustava vaahtomuovirakenne; Huomioväri; Vaihdettava piikki tai jalusta; LED-valot; Kiinteät poikkipuut; Pop-up-malli; Jousipalautus; Säänkestävä; Painotettu jalusta; Muu
zh-CN: 板球球门柱目标特性: 柔性泡沫结构; 高可见度颜色; 可互换地钉或底座; LED 灯; 固定横木; 弹出式设计; 弹簧回弹; 防风雨; 加重底座; 其他